Washington statutes.
RCW 5.56.061

Failure to attend considered contempt of court.

A failure to attend as required by the subpoena, shall also be considered a contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.

[ 1989 c 373 s 8; Code 1881 s 399; 1877 p 88 s 401; 1869 p 106 s 394; 1854 p 188 s 301; RRS s 1220, part. Formerly RCW 5.56.060, part.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 45(f).

Criminal contempt: RCW 9.92.040.

Power of courts and judicial officers to punish for contempt: RCW 2.28.020, 2.28.070.